District of Columbia statutes.
38-926

Termination.

The authority of the Department and of the advisory board shall terminate upon direction of the Mayor of the District of Columbia and in any event no later than the repeal of § 484(j) and (k) of Title 40, United States Code. Upon such termination, the assets of the Department shall be disposed of as the Mayor may direct.

History

Aug. 16, 1950, 64 Stat. 451, ch. 720, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-303.
1973 Ed., § 31-1303.

Editor's Notes

Educational Agency for Surplus Property abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-924.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.